Mississippi, session 2026, HB1704.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 37-173-13, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 37-173-13.  (1) The * * *maximum scholarship granted per eligible student with dyslexia each school year shall be an amount equivalent to the * * *student base amount under the total funding formula provided in Sections 37‑151‑200 through 37‑151‑215 amount awarded to students under the Educational Scholarship Account (ESA) program pursuant to Section 37-181-7 for the same school year. (2)  (a)  The nonpublic school under this program shall report to the State Department of Education the number of students with dyslexia who are enrolled in nonpublic schools on the Mississippi Dyslexia Therapy Scholarships as of September 30 of each year in order to determine funding for the subsequent year.  Funds may not be transferred from any funding provided to the Mississippi School for the Deaf and the Blind for program participants who are eligible under Section 37-173-5. (b)  The State Department of Education will disburse payments to nonpublic schools under this program in twelve (12) substantially equal installments.  The initial payment shall be made after department verification of admission acceptance, and subsequent payments shall be made upon verification of continued enrollment and attendance at the nonpublic school. SECTION 2.  Section 37-175-13, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 37-175-13.  (1)  The * * *maximum scholarship granted per eligible student with speech-language impairment each school year shall be an amount equivalent to the * * *state share of per student funding under the total funding formula provided in Sections 37‑151‑200 through 37‑151‑215 in the school district in which a student resides amount awarded to students under the Educational Scholarship Account (ESA) program pursuant to Section 37-181-7 for the same school year. (2)  (a)  Any nonpublic school under this program shall report to the State Department of Education the number of students with speech-language impairment who are enrolled in nonpublic schools on the Mississippi Speech-Language Therapy Scholarships as of September 30 of each year in order to determine funding for the subsequent year.  Funds may not be transferred from any funding provided to the Mississippi School for the Deaf and the Blind for program participants who are eligible under Section 37-175-5. (b)  The State Department of Education shall make payments to nonpublic schools for each student at the nonpublic school equal to the state share of the total funding formula payments for each student in net enrollment at the school district from which the student transferred.  In calculating the local contribution for purposes of determining the state share of the total funding formula payments, the department shall deduct the pro rata local contribution of the school district in which the student resides, to be determined as provided in Section 37-151-211(2). (c)  Payments made pursuant to this subsection by the State Department of Education must be made at the same time and in the same manner as the total funding formula payments are made to school districts under Sections 37-151-101 and 37-151-103.  Amounts payable to a nonpublic school must be determined by the State Department of Education. (3)  If the parent opts to remove a child from a public school to a nonpublic special purpose school and to receive a scholarship under this chapter, then transportation shall be provided at the parent's or guardian's expense. SECTION 3.  Section 37-181-7, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 37-181-7.  (1)  New enrollment in the ESA program created in this chapter shall be limited to five hundred (500) additional students each year.  Subject to appropriation from the General Fund, each student's ESA shall be funded at Six Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($6,500.00) for school year 2015-2016.  For each subsequent year, this amount shall increase or decrease by the same proportion as the student base amount under Section 37-151-203 is increased or decreased. (2)  Subject to appropriation, eligible students shall be approved for participation in the ESA program as follows: (a)  Students shall be approved on a first-come, first-served basis, with applications being reviewed on a rolling basis; (b)  After participation reaches fifty percent (50%) of the annual enrollment limits in subsection (1) of this section, the department shall set annual application deadlines for the remaining number of available ESAs and begin to maintain a waiting list of eligible students.  The waitlist shall only include eligible students who have certified to the department that they have been accepted into an eligible school qualified to provide services for the participating student's disability or special education needs, or provide services addressing a participating student's IEP.  The waitlist will be maintained in the chronological order in which applications are received.  The department shall award ESA program applications in chronological order according to the waitlist; and (c)  Participating students who remain eligible for the ESA program are automatically approved for participation for the following year and are not subject to the random selection process. (3)  No funds for an ESA may be expended from the total funding formula funds provided in this chapter, nor shall any school district be required to provide funding for an ESA. SECTION 4.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.